Tennessee, session 114, SB0659.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-102(8)(B), is amended by
adding the language "or a bona fide religious institution" immediately after the language
"volunteer fire department".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0659
002138
- 1 -